New York, session 2025-2026, A10947.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3-200 of the election law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. No later than December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six, the 4 state board of elections shall prescribe qualifications for all commis- 5 sioners of boards of elections in each county and the city of New York. 6 Such qualifications shall include, but not be limited to, the qualifica- 7 tions prescribed by section three of the public officers law, and demon- 8 strated experience in election administration or other management, oper- 9 ations, or administrative experience in the public, non-profit, or 10 private sector as deemed sufficient by the board. Such qualifications 11 shall apply to appointments made beginning thirty days after promulga- 12 tion of such qualifications and shall thereafter be reviewed by such 13 board at least every two years and updated as necessary. Such quali- 14 fications shall be prescribed by the board only after consideration of 15 the skills and knowledge necessary or useful for the exercise of the 16 duties and responsibilities of such commissioners, as well as the abili- 17 ty to recruit a sufficient number of candidates to be commissioners. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09681-01-5